Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 12 Returns
21-2-501.
Number of votes required for election; runoff.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, no candidate shall be nominated for public office in any primary or special primary or elected to public office in any election or special election or shall take or be sworn into such elected public office unless such candidate shall have received a majority of the votes cast to fill such nomination or public office. In instances where no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast, a run-off primary, special primary runoff, run-off election, or special election runoff between the candidates receiving the two highest numbers of votes shall be held. Unless such date is postponed by a court order, such runoff shall be held on the twenty-eighth day after the day of holding the preceding general or special primary or general or special election.

If any candidate eligible to be in a runoff withdraws, dies, or is found to be ineligible, the remaining candidates receiving the two highest numbers of votes shall be the candidates in the runoff.

The candidate receiving the highest number of the votes cast in such run-off primary, special primary runoff, run-off election, or special election runoff to fill the nomination or public office sought shall be declared the winner.

The name of a write-in candidate eligible for election in a runoff shall be printed on the election or special election run-off ballot in the independent column.

The run-off primary, special primary runoff, run-off election, or special election runoff shall be a continuation of the primary, special primary, election, or special election for the particular office concerned. Only the electors who are duly registered to vote and not subsequently deemed disqualified to vote in the runoff for candidates for that particular office shall be entitled to vote therein, and only those votes cast for the persons designated as candidates in such run-off primary, special primary runoff, run-off election, or special election runoff shall be counted in the tabulation and canvass of the votes cast. No elector shall vote in a run-off primary or special primary runoff in violation of Code Section 21-2-224.

For the purposes of this subsection, the word “plurality” shall mean the receiving by one candidate alone of the highest number of votes cast. If the municipal charter or ordinances of a municipality as now existing or as amended subsequent to September 1, 1968, provide that a candidate may be nominated or elected by a plurality of the votes cast to fill such nomination or public office, such provision shall prevail. Otherwise, no municipal candidate shall be nominated for public office in any primary or elected to public office in any election unless such candidate shall have received a majority of the votes cast to fill such nomination or public office.

In instances in which no municipal candidate receives a majority of the votes cast and the municipal charter or ordinances do not provide for nomination or election by a plurality vote, a run-off primary or election shall be held between the candidates receiving the two highest numbers of votes. Such runoff shall be held on the twenty-eighth day after the day of holding the first primary or election, unless such run-off date is postponed by court order. No elector shall vote in a run-off primary in violation of Code Section 21-2-216. The run-off primary or election shall be a continuation of the first primary or election, and only those votes cast for the candidates receiving the two highest numbers of votes in the first primary or election shall be counted. No write-in votes may be cast in such a primary, run-off primary, or run-off election. If any candidate eligible to be in a runoff withdraws, dies, or is found to be ineligible, the remaining candidates receiving the two highest numbers of votes shall be the candidates in such runoff. The municipal candidate receiving the highest number of the votes cast in such run-off primary or run-off election to fill the nomination or public office sought shall be declared the winner. The municipality shall give written notice to the Secretary of State of such runoff as soon as such municipality certifies the preceding primary, special primary, election, or special election.

The name of a municipal write-in candidate eligible for election in a municipal runoff shall be printed on the municipal run-off election ballot in the independent column.

In all cities having a population in excess of 100,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census, in order for a municipal candidate to be nominated for public office in any primary or elected to public office in any municipal election, he or she must receive a majority of the votes cast.

Except for presidential electors, to be elected to public office in a general election, a candidate must receive a majority of the votes cast in an election to fill such public office. To be elected to the office of presidential electors, no slate of candidates shall be required to receive a majority of the votes cast, but that slate of candidates shall be elected to such office which receives the highest number of votes cast.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1513, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 257, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1971, p. 602, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 867, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 904, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1718, § 10; Ga. L. 1983, p. 827, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, § 10; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 11; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 10; Ga. L. 1996, p. 101, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 20; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 39; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 825, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 17; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 42; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 59; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 63/HB 244; Ga. L. 2008, p. 817, § 7/HB 1098; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 24/HB 540; Ga. L. 2014, p. 1, § 7/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 2, § 2/HB 42; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 42/SB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective February 23, 2017, added the proviso at the end of paragraph (a)(6); and added the proviso at the end of the second sentence of subsection (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, in paragraph (a)(1), inserted “or shall take or be sworn into such elected public office” near the middle of the first sentence and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “Unless such date is postponed by a court order, such run-off primary, special primary runoff, run-off election, or special election runoff shall be held as provided in this subsection.”; deleted former paragraphs (a)(2) through (a)(6), which read: “(2) In the case of a runoff from a general primary or a special primary or special election held in conjunction with a general primary, the runoff shall be held on the Tuesday of the ninth week following such general primary.

“(3) In the case of a runoff from a general election for a federal office or a runoff from a special primary or special election for a federal office held in conjunction with a general election, the runoff shall be held on the Tuesday of the ninth week following such general election.

“(4) In the case of a runoff from a general election for an office other than a federal office or a runoff from a special primary or special election for an office other than a federal office held in conjunction with a general election, the runoff shall be held on the twenty-eighth day after the day of holding the preceding general election.

“(5) In the case of a runoff from a special primary or special election for a federal office not held in conjunction with a general primary or general election, the runoff shall be held on the Tuesday of the ninth week following such special primary or special election.

“(6) In the case of a runoff from a special primary or special election for an office other than a federal office not held in conjunction with a general primary or general election, the runoff shall be held on the twenty-eighth day after the day of holding the preceding special primary or special election; provided, however, that, if such runoff is from a special primary or special election held in conjunction with a special primary or special election for a federal office and there is a runoff being conducted for such federal office, the runoff from the special primary or special election conducted for such other office may be held in conjunction with the runoff for the federal office.”, redesignated former paragraphs (a)(7) through (a)(10) as present paragraphs (a)(2) through (a)(5), respectively; in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(5), substituted “who are” for “who were” and substituted “runoff for” for “primary, special primary, election, or special election for” in the second sentence in present paragraph (a)(5); and, in subsection (c), substituted “court order. No elector” for “court order; provided, however, that, in the case of a runoff from a municipal special election that is held in conjunction with a special election for a federal office and not in conjunction with a general primary or general election, the municipality may conduct such runoff from such municipal special election on the date of the special election runoff for the federal office. Only the electors entitled to vote in the first primary or election shall be entitled to vote in any run-off primary or election resulting therefrom; provided, however, that no elector”.

Cross references.

Run-off elections, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. II.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 827, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article II, Section II, Paragraph II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For note, “Who Drew Congressional District Lines: The Georgia General Assembly or the United States Department of Justice?,” see 11 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 381 (1995).

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 93 (2014).

For note, “Georgia’s Runoff Election System Has Run Its Course,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 1063 (2020).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-501.1.
[Repealed] Timing whenever a municipal general primary is held in conjunction with the general primary in even-numbered years.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-501.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 40/SB 92, effective July 1, 2012.

21-2-502.
Issuance of certificates of election and commission; Governor’s proclamation as to constitutional amendments.

Governor and other constitutional officers. Upon completing the tabulation of any election for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State School Superintendent, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture, or Commissioner of Labor, the Secretary of State shall lay the same before the Governor upon his or her oath of office as Governor; and the Governor, upon the other constitutional officers taking their oaths of office, shall issue a commission under the great seal of the State of Georgia signed by the Governor and countersigned by the Secretary of State, to each such person. The Secretary of State shall issue the commission to the person elected Governor.

United States senators; representatives in Congress; members of the General Assembly.

Upon completing the tabulation of any election for United States senator or representative in Congress, the Secretary of State shall lay the same before the Governor, who shall immediately issue certificates of election and commissions under the seal of the state, duly signed by the Governor and attested by the Secretary of State and deliver the same to the candidates receiving the required number of votes to be elected to the respective offices.

The Secretary of State shall issue certificates of election to the persons elected members of the Senate and the House of Representatives of the General Assembly and, between the hours of 12:00 Noon and 1:00 P.M. on the second Monday in January of each odd-numbered year, present before the Senate and the House of Representatives the several returns of the elections of members of the respective houses. In case of a special election the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of election to each person so elected, and the Secretary of State shall present the returns of such election to the proper house as soon as received and tabulated by the Secretary of State. Immediately upon their taking the oath of office, each member of the Senate and the House of Representatives shall be issued a commission under the great seal of the State of Georgia, signed by the Secretary of State.

Justices of the Supreme Court, Judges of the Court of Appeals, Commissioners of the Georgia Public Service Commission, judges of the superior court, judges of the juvenile court, and district attorneys. Upon completion of the tabulation the Secretary of State shall certify the result of each election of Justices of the Supreme Court, of Judges of the Court of Appeals, of Commissioners of the Georgia Public Service Commission, of judges of the superior court, of judges of the juvenile court where elected, and of district attorneys to the Governor and shall issue a certificate of election to each person so elected. The Governor shall, upon each such person taking the oath of office, immediately issue a commission under the great seal of the State of Georgia, signed by the Governor and countersigned by the Secretary of State, to each such person.

County officers. The superintendent in each county shall, as soon as the returns have been properly certified, issue certificates of election to the successful candidates for all county officers to be filled by the votes of electors of such county. Immediately upon taking the oath of office, each such county officer shall be issued a commission under the seal of the executive department, signed by the Governor and countersigned by one of his or her secretaries.

Presidential electors. The Secretary of State, on receiving and computing the returns of presidential electors, shall lay them before the Governor, who shall enumerate and ascertain the number of votes for each person so voted for and shall cause a certificate of election to be delivered to each person so chosen.

Constitutional amendments. Upon receiving the certified results of elections on all constitutional amendments from the Secretary of State, the Governor shall issue his or her proclamation declaring the results of the vote of each amendment.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1252; Code 1868, § 1333; Code 1873, § 1312; Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 67, § 1; Code 1882, § 1312; Ga. L. 1888, p. 33, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 90; Civil Code 1910, § 104; Code 1933, § 34-2502; Ga. L. 1958, p. 208, § 7; Code 1933, § 34-1511, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 6-7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 565, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 15; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 565, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to judges of the juvenile court elected or appointed after July 1, 1984.

21-2-503.
Issuance of commission to person whose election is contested; procedure upon finding that person to whom commission was issued was not legally elected; swearing into office of person whose election is contested.

A commission which is to be issued, as provided for by this chapter, to any person elected to any office shall be issued notwithstanding the fact that the election of such person to any such office may be contested in the manner provided by this chapter. Whenever it shall appear, by the final judgment of the proper tribunal having jurisdiction of a contested election, that the person to whom such commission shall have been issued has not been elected legally to the office for which he or she has been commissioned, then a commission shall be issued to the person who shall appear to be elected legally to such office. The issuing of such commission shall nullify the commission already issued; and all power and authority first issued under such commission shall thereupon cease.

Upon the certification of the results of the election, a person elected to a municipal office may be sworn into office notwithstanding that the election of such person may be contested in the manner provided by this chapter. Upon the final judgment of the proper tribunal having jurisdiction of a contested election which orders a second election or declares that another person was legally elected to the office, the person sworn into municipal office shall cease to hold the office and shall cease to exercise the powers, duties, and privileges of the office immediately.

Upon the certification of the results of the election, a person elected to a federal, state, or county office may be sworn into office notwithstanding that the election of such person may be contested in the manner provided by this chapter. Upon the final judgment of the proper tribunal having jurisdiction of a contested election which orders a second election or declares that another person was legally elected to the office, the person sworn into such office shall cease to hold the office and shall cease to exercise the powers, duties, and privileges of the office immediately.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 124, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 107; Ga. L. 1898, p. 44, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 121; Code 1933, § 34-2801; Code 1933, § 34-1512, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 20/SB 82.

21-2-504.
Special primary or election upon failure to nominate or elect or upon death, withdrawal, or failure of officer-elect to qualify.

Whenever any primary or election shall fail to fill a particular nomination or office and such failure cannot be cured by a run-off primary or election, whenever any person elected to public office shall die or withdraw prior to taking office, or whenever any person elected to public office shall fail to take that office validly, the authority with whom the candidates for such nomination or office file notice of candidacy shall call a special primary or election to fill such position. If a special primary will not be held and unless otherwise provided by law, the call of a special election shall be made within 45 days after the occurrence of the vacancy.

Whenever any person elected to municipal public office shall, after taking office, die, withdraw, or for any other reason create a vacancy in his or her office and the municipal charter fails to provide a method for the filling of such vacancy, the governing authority shall thereupon call a special election to fill such vacancy.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1514, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1980, p. 685, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 13; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Special elections and primaries generally, §

21-2-540

, et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Calls for primaries and elections, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Dates of Primaries and Elections, § 183-1-8-.01.